Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,174
Notice of appraisal rights.

(MBCA 13.20) (a) When any
corporate action specified in subsection (a) of section 21-2,172 is to be
submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, the meeting notice must state
that the corporation has concluded that the shareholders are, are not, or
may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.
If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available,
a copy of sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183 must accompany the meeting notice
sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

(b) In a merger pursuant
to section 21-2,165, the parent corporation must notify in writing all record
shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights
that the corporate action became effective. Such notice must be sent within
ten days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials
described in section 21-2,176.

(c) When any corporate action specified in subsection
(a) of section 21-2,172 is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders
pursuant to section 21-256:

(1)
Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not, or may be available must
be sent to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the
time consent of such shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation
has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, must be accompanied
by a copy of sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183; and

(2) Written notice that appraisal rights
are, are not, or may be available must be delivered together with the notice
to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by subsections (e) and
(f) of section 21-256, may include the materials described in section 21-2,176,
and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be
available, must be accompanied by a copy of sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(d) When corporate action
described in subsection (a) of section 21-2,172 is proposed or a merger pursuant
to section 21-2,165 is effected, the notice referred to in subsection (a)
or (c) of this section, if the corporation concludes that appraisal rights
are or may be available, and in subsection (b) of this section shall be accompanied
by:

(1)
The annual financial statements specified in subsection (a) of section 21-2,227
of the corporation that issued the shares that may be subject to appraisal,
which shall be as of a date ending not more than sixteen months before the
date of the notice and shall comply with subsection (b) of section 21-2,227,
except that if such annual financial statements are not reasonably available,
the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information;
and

(2)
The latest available quarterly financial statements of such corporation, if
any.

(e)
The right to receive the information described in subsection (d) of this section
may be waived in writing by a shareholder before or after the corporate action.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 174.
January 1, 2016